Delaware, session 153, HB185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 8711A, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8711A. Site Readiness Fund. (l) (1) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), an applicant who seeks to create affordable housing may be approved for funding under this section if the applicant demonstrates that the affordable housing will increase economic development in the State. (2) For purposes of this section, âaffordable housingâ is housing that is all of the following: a. Affordable to individuals or families with a household income at or below the median State income. b. Costs no more than 30% of a householdâs gross annual income, whether in total rental and utility costs or combined mortgage, property taxes, and required insurance.